src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h39_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    politi+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: politi
    politi+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: politi
    politi+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: politii
    politi+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: politis
    politi+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: politi
    politi+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: politi
    politi+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: politium
    politi+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: politia
    politi+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: politiið
    politi+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: politiið
    politi+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: politinum
    politi+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: politisins
    politi+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: politiini
    politi+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: politiini
    politi+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: politiunum
    politi+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: politianna
